District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.02

Railroads prohibited on certain streets.

All railroads are prohibited on the I Street and K Street fronts of Farragut, Scott, and Franklin Squares.

R.S., D.C., § 223
1981 Ed., § 7-1402.
1973 Ed., § 7-1202.